Utah statutes.
61-2-28.   Utah Housing Opportunity Restricted Account.
(1)  There is created in the General Fund a restricted account known as the
"Utah Housing Opportunity Restricted Account."
(2)  The account shall be funded by:
(a)  contributions deposited into the Utah Housing Opportunity Restricted
Account in accordance with Section 41-1a-422;
(b)  private contributions; and
(c)  donations or grants from public or private entities.
(3)  Funds in the account are nonlapsing.
(4) (a)  The state treasurer shall invest monies in the account according to
Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.
(b)  The Division of Finance shall deposit interest or other earnings derived
from investment of account monies into the General Fund.
(5)  The Legislature shall appropriate money in the account to the division.
(6)  The division shall distribute the funds to one or more charitable
organizations that:
(a)  qualify as being tax exempt under Section 501(c)(3), Internal Revenue
Code; and
(b)  have as a primary part of their mission to provide support to
organizations that create affordable housing for those in severe need.
(7)  The division may only consider proposals that are:
(a)  proposed by an organization under Subsection (6); and
(b)  designed to provide support to organizations that create affordable
housing for those in severe need.
(8) (a)  An organization described in Subsection (6) may apply to the division
to receive a distribution in accordance with Subsection (6).
(b)  An organization that receives a distribution from the division in
accordance with Subsection (6) shall expend the distribution only to provide
support to organizations that create affordable housing for those in severe
need.
(9)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the division shall make rules providing procedures for an organization to
apply to receive funds under this section.
